California, session 20252026, SB1272.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 53069.4 of the Government Code is amended to read:53069.4. (a) (1) The legislative body of a local agency, as the term “local agency” is defined in Section 54951, may by ordinance make any violation of any ordinance enacted by the local agency subject to an administrative fine or penalty. The local agency shall set forth by ordinance the administrative procedures that shall govern the imposition, enforcement, collection, and administrative review by the local agency of those administrative fines or penalties. Where the violation would otherwise be an infraction, the administrative fine or penalty shall not exceed the maximum fine or penalty amounts for infractions set forth in Section 25132 and subdivision (b) of Section 36900.(2) (A) (i) The administrative procedures set forth by ordinance adopted by the local agency pursuant to this subdivision shall provide for a reasonable period of time, as specified in the ordinance, for a person responsible for a continuing violation to correct or otherwise remedy the violation prior to the imposition of administrative fines or penalties, when the violation pertains to building, plumbing, electrical, or other similar structural or zoning issues, that do not create an immediate danger to health or safety.(ii) (I) For any violation pertaining to building, plumbing, electrical, or other similar structural or zoning issues, that do not create an immediate danger to health or safety, of any ordinance enacted by the local agency, the reasonable period of time to correct or otherwise remedy the violation shall be no less than six months if all of the following conditions are met:(ia) The property involved in the violation is a residential property that is owner occupied. an owner-occupied residential property containing only four units or less.(ib) The current owner of the property submits a sworn affidavit that the current owner was not responsible for any action that caused the violation and that the current owner had no knowledge of the violation at the time the owner took title to the property.(ic) The current owner of the property provides evidence that the violation was not disclosed in a transfer disclosure statement pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1102) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.(II) A local agency shall extend the reasonable period of time described in subclause (I) by an additional six months upon a showing by the current owner of a good faith effort to correct or otherwise remedy the violation, and may extend the reasonable period of time beyond the extension provided by this subclause in its discretion. The local agency shall not impose an administrative fee associated with a request for an extension pursuant to this subclause.(III) This clause shall not apply to an administrative fine or penalty that is imposed for a violation of any of the following:(ia) Any law, regulation, or local ordinance regulating or prohibiting the cultivating, manufacturing, producing, processing, preparing, storing, providing, donating, selling, delivering, or distributing of cannabis or cannabis products, including, but not limited to, an ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 26200 of the Business and Professions Code.(ib) The State Housing Law, Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 17910) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, and regulations or ordinances adopted pursuant to that part, if the violation results in the building being substandard as described in Section 17920.3 of the Health and Safety Code.(ic) Any law, regulation, or local ordinance that ensures the habitability of rental housing, including, but not limited to, a violation under any law, regulation, or local ordinance that would also be a violation of Section 1941.1 of the Civil Code.(id) Any of the following laws or regulations relating to fire hazards:(Ia) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4251) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4291) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code.(Ib) Chapter 6.8 (commencing with Section 51175) of Part 1 of Division 1.(Ic) Part 2 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 11 of the Health and Safety Code.(Id) Part 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.(Ie) Section R337 of the California Residential Code (Part 2.5 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(If) Parts II, IV, and V of the California Fire Code (Part 9 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(Ig) Chapter 12-7A of the California Referenced Standards Code (Part 12 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).(ie) Any regulations adopted pursuant to the laws in sub-subclause (id).(if) Any local ordinances implementing the laws or regulations in sub-subclause (id) or establishing substantially similar requirements for any lands, structures, or activities.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the ordinance adopted by the local agency pursuant to this subdivision may declare commercial cannabis activity undertaken without a license as required by Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code to be a public nuisance and provide for the immediate imposition of administrative fines or penalties for the violation of local zoning restrictions or building, plumbing, electrical, or other similar structural, or health and safety requirements if the violation exists as a result of, or to facilitate, the unlicensed cultivation, manufacturing, processing, distribution, or retail sale of cannabis for which a license is required. This subparagraph shall not be construed to apply to cannabis cultivation or activity that is lawfully undertaken pursuant to Section 11362.1 or 11362.5 of the Health and Safety Code, to commercial cannabis activity undertaken pursuant to a license under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code and applicable state regulations, or to a person exempt from licensure pursuant to Section 26033 of the Business and Professions Code.(C) If a local agency adopts an ordinance that provides for the immediate imposition of administrative fines or penalties as allowed in subparagraph (B), that ordinance may impose the administrative fines and penalties upon the property owner and upon each owner of the occupant business entity engaging in unlicensed commercial cannabis activity and may hold them jointly and severally liable for the administrative fines and penalties.(D) Administrative fines or penalties that are immediately imposed pursuant to an ordinance adopted under subparagraph (B) shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation and shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day. This subparagraph shall not be construed to limit the immediate imposition of larger fines that are otherwise authorized by applicable law and shall not be construed to limit administrative fines or penalties that are imposed after notice and a reasonable time to correct pursuant to subparagraph (A).(E) An ordinance adopted pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall provide for a reasonable period of time for the correction or remedy of the violation prior to the imposition of administrative fines or penalties as required in subparagraph (A) if all of the following are true:(i) A tenant is in possession of the property that is the subject of the administrative action.(ii) The rental property owner or agent can provide evidence that the rental or lease agreement prohibits the commercial cannabis activity.(iii) The rental property owner or agent did not know the tenant was engaging in unlicensed commercial cannabis activity for which a license was required and no complaint, property inspection, or other information caused the rental property owner or agent to have actual notice of the unlicensed commercial cannabis activity.(F) A local agency that passes an ordinance pursuant to subparagraph (B) may refer cases involving unlicensed commercial cannabis activity to the Attorney General to undertake civil enforcement action pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of, or Section 26038 of, the Business and Professions Code or any other applicable law.(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 1094.5 or 1094.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure, within 20 days after service of the final administrative order or decision of the local agency is made pursuant to an ordinance enacted in accordance with this section regarding the imposition, enforcement, or collection of the administrative fines or penalties, a person contesting that final administrative order or decision may seek review by filing an appeal to be heard by the superior court, where the same shall be heard de novo, except that the contents of the local agency’s file in the case shall be received in evidence. A proceeding under this subdivision is a limited civil case. A copy of the document or instrument of the local agency providing notice of the violation and imposition of the administrative fine or penalty shall be admitted into evidence as prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein. A copy of the notice of appeal shall be served in person or by first-class mail upon the local agency by the contestant.(2) The fee for filing the notice of appeal shall be as specified in Section 70615. The court shall request that the local agency’s file on the case be forwarded to the court, to be received within 15 days of the request. The court shall retain the fee specified in Section 70615 regardless of the outcome of the appeal. If the court finds in favor of the contestant, the amount of the fee shall be reimbursed to the contestant by the local agency. Any deposit of the fine or penalty shall be refunded by the local agency in accordance with the judgment of the court.(3) The conduct of the appeal under this section is a subordinate judicial duty that may be performed by traffic trial commissioners and other subordinate judicial officials at the direction of the presiding judge of the court.(c) If no notice of appeal of the local agency’s final administrative order or decision is filed within the period set forth in this section, the order or decision shall be deemed confirmed.(d) If the fine or penalty has not been deposited and the decision of the court is against the contestant, the local agency may proceed to collect the penalty pursuant to the procedures set forth in its ordinance.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that keeping costs predictable for homeowners to address the state’s growing affordability challenges is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act amending Section 53069.4 of the Government Code applies to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.